Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB54.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5522(c) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5522. Six months limitation.* * *(c) Exception.--This section shall not apply to any civil action or proceeding brought under section 8522(b)(10) or (11) (relating to exceptions to sovereign immunity) or 8542(b)(9) or (10) (relating to exceptions to governmental immunity).Section 2. Section 8522(b) of Title 42 is amended by adding 12345678910111213141516171819202122 a paragraph to read:§ 8522. Exceptions to sovereign immunity.* * *(b) Acts which may impose liability.--The following acts by a Commonwealth party may result in the imposition of liability on the Commonwealth and the defense of sovereign immunity shall not be raised to claims for damages caused by:* * *(11) Wrongful conviction.--A wrongful conviction for which a claim may be brought under section 8583 (relating to petition for compensation).Section 3. Section 8528(d) of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 8528. Limitations on damages.* * *(d) Exclusions.--This section shall not apply to damages awarded under section 8522(b)(10) or (11).Section 4. Section 8542(b) of Title 42 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 8542. Exceptions to governmental immunity.* * *(b) Acts which may impose liability.--The following acts by a local agency or any of its employees may result in the imposition of liability on a local agency:* * *(10) Wrongful conviction.--A wrongful conviction for which a petition may be filed under section 8583 (relating to petition for compensation).* * *Section 5. Chapter 85 of Title 42 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:20250SB0054PN0452 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBCHAPTER DCLAIMS FOR COMPENSATION FOR WRONGFUL CONVICTIONSec.8581. Scope of subchapter.8582. Eligibility to seek compensation for wrongful conviction.8583. Petition for compensation.8584. Compensation.8585. Notice to Treasury . 8586. Statute of limitations.§ 8581. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to the provision of compensation for a wrongful conviction.§ 8582. Eligibility to seek compensation for wrongful conviction.(a) Cause of action authorized.--An action may be brought under this subchapter to seek compensation for the wrongful conviction of an individual. The claim may be brought by:(1) An individual who was convicted of a crime for which the individual was subsequently incarcerated or subject to involuntary treatment, has served all or any part of the sentence, alleges prima facie evidence of actual innocence of the crime or crimes and at least one of the following applies:(i) The conviction was dismissed, overturned, reversed or vacated on direct or collateral review on the basis of actual innocence and the charge was not refiled.(ii) The conviction was dismissed, overturned, reversed or vacated on direct or collateral review on the basis of actual innocence and the individual is acquitted after retrial.20250SB0054PN0452 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The conviction was overturned, reversed or vacated on direct or collateral review on the basis of actual innocence and the individual subsequently entered an Alford plea or plea of no contest when otherwise eligible to seek retrial.(iv) A full pardon has been issued by the Governor on the basis of actual innocence.(2) The heirs of an individual meeting the criteria under paragraph (1), if the individual is deceased, notwithstanding if the heirs are residents of this Commonwealth.(b) Ineligibility for compensation.--A claimant may not seek compensation under this subchapter if any of the following apply:(1) The individual was an accomplice, coconspirator, solicitor or accessory in the commission of the crime for which the individual was originally convicted and meaningfully participated in the crime.(2) The individual was also serving a sentence for another crime for which the individual was lawfully incarcerated for the entirety of the time otherwise eligible for compensation.(3) The individual committed perjury or witness intimidation or fabricated evidence at the original trial. A confession or admission later found to be false or a guilty plea, Alford plea or a plea of no contest shall not constitute perjury or fabrication of evidence.(4) The individual was convicted of a felony arising from the same set of facts as the crime for which the individual was originally convicted. A subsequent Alford plea 20250SB0054PN0452 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or plea of no contest based on the same set of facts as the crime for which the individual was originally convicted shall not bar a claimant from filing a petition.§ 8583. Petition for compensation.(a) Form and filing.--A petition for compensation shall be in a form and manner determined by the Supreme Court. Petitions shall be filed and heard by Commonwealth Court. A proceeding before Commonwealth Court shall be governed by rules established by Commonwealth Court, which shall emphasize informality to the greatest extent possible. A claimant shall not be required to be represented or accompanied by an attorney.(b) Contents of petition.--To present a claim for compensation for wrongful conviction, the petition must include a statement of claim establishing the following:(1) The individual meets the eligibility criteria listed under section 8582 (relating to eligibility to seek compensation for wrongful conviction).(2) The individual was sentenced to incarceration, or to confinement in an institution under section 6403 (relating to court-ordered involuntary treatment), based on the wrongful conviction and has served all or any part of that sentence.(3) The specific dates for which the individual is seeking compensation, subject to any excludable periods.(4) The individual does not have ineligibility factors under section 8582.(5) The specific compensation the petitioner is requesting if the petition were granted.(6) Evidence supporting the claimant's actual innocence of the crime for which the claimant was incarcerated, which may include:20250SB0054PN0452 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The filings under Subchapter B of Chapter 95 (relating to post conviction relief) from the case showing that the claimant meets the criteria under section 8582.(ii) The court transcripts from the case showing that the claimant meets the criteria under section 8582.(iii) An explanation as to why the claimant should be considered eligible to seek compensation.(c) Service.--Upon receipt of a filed petition, the court shall forward a copy of the petition to the prosecuting entity which may be either:(1) the district attorney in the district where the individual was prosecuted; or(2) the Office of Attorney General if the individual was prosecuted by the Office of Attorney General.(d) Response to petition.--Upon receipt of service, the prosecuting entity shall within 30 days respond to the petition and state that either:(1) The prosecuting entity agrees that the petitioner meets the eligibility for compensation and declines to oppose the claim.(2) The prosecuting entity disagrees that the petitioner meets the eligibility for compensation and requests a hearing to present evidence to oppose the claim.(e) Hearings.--(1) If a hearing is requested by the prosecuting entity, the court shall schedule a hearing as soon as possible, provided the petitioner and the prosecuting entity have at least 15 days' notice.(2) If the court determines a hearing is necessary to 20250SB0054PN0452 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determine a petitioner's eligibility and entitlement to compensation, the court may schedule a hearing if the petitioner and the prosecuting entity have at least 15 days' notice.(3) If the court denies a petition without having held a hearing, the court shall provide notice to the petitioner and the prosecuting entity that the petitioner has 15 days from the date of the notice to request a hearing. Upon receipt of a petitioner's request, the court shall schedule a hearing as soon as possible, if the petitioner and the prosecuting entity have at least 15 days' notice.(4) Following any hearing on a petition for compensation where evidence is presented, the court shall determine if all the following apply:(i) The petitioner meets the eligibility criteria under section 8582(a).(ii) The individual who is the subject of the petition does not have any ineligibility factors under section 8582(b).(iii) The court is satisfied of the individual's actual innocence of the crime for which the individual was incarcerated.(5) Following any hearing on a petition for compensation, the court shall state its finding for the record. A petitioner whose petition is determined to meet the criteria in paragraph (4) is entitled to compensation under section 8584 (relating to compensation).(6) If the petition is denied, the petitioner has the right to immediately appeal.(f) Granting petition.--20250SB0054PN0452 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The court shall grant the petition on the merits of the claim if:(i) unopposed by the prosecuting entity; and(ii) the court is satisfied that the petitioner meets the eligibility requirements and the individual who is the subject of the petition is not ineligible based on ineligibility factors of section 8582.(2) If a hearing was held, the court shall state its findings of the petitioner's eligibility and entitlement to compensation in its order granting or denying the petition.(3) In an order granting the petition, the court shall also order compensation under section 8584.§ 8584. Compensation.(a) Granting of petition.--If Commonwealth Court grants a petition and enters an order in favor of the petitioner:(1) The court shall order the following:(i) Statutory noneconomic damages, as adjusted by subsection (c), of $100,000 for each year of imprisonment or involuntary treatment while awaiting a sentence of death.(ii) Statutory noneconomic damages, as adjusted by subsection (c), of $75,000 for each year of imprisonment or involuntary treatment for any other sentence.(iii) Statutory noneconomic damages, as adjusted by subsection (c), of $50,000 for each year spent on parole or probation.(2) The court may order the following if requested by the petitioner:(i) Reimbursement of unreimbursed costs, fines, fees or surcharges imposed on the individual as a result of 20250SB0054PN0452 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the conviction which were paid by or on behalf of the individual.(ii) Reimbursement of unreimbursed restitution paid by the individual because of the conviction.(iii) Compensation for reasonable reintegrative services and mental and physical health care costs incurred by the individual for the period between the individual's release from incarceration or involuntary treatment and the date of the petitioner's award.(iv) Separation services and programs available to any other individual leaving incarceration.(v) Reasonable attorney fees for obtaining the dismissal, overturning, reversal or vacation of the underlying conviction, calculated at 10% of the damage awarded plus expenses. Exclusive of expenses, the fees may not exceed $75,000, as adjusted annually to account for inflation from the effective date of this section, unless the court approves an additional amount for good cause. The fees may not be deducted from the compensation awarded to the claimant nor may counsel receive additional fees from the client for this matter.(vi) Reasonable attorney fees and expenses for obtaining compensation under this section. The fees may not be deducted from the compensation awarded to the claimant, nor may counsel receive additional fees from the client for this matter.(vii) Child support payments owed by the individual that became due and interest on child support arrearages that accrued during the time the individual was wrongfully incarcerated but were not paid. The 20250SB0054PN0452 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compensation shall be provided out of the total statutory noneconomic damages awarded to the petitioner under this section.(b) Statutory noneconomic damages.--If statutory noneconomic damages are awarded, the following shall apply:(1) The payment of damages shall be prorated for partial years of imprisonment.(2) The payment of damages shall be to or for the benefit of the individual who is the subject of the petition as elected by the individual.(3) For a deceased individual who was wrongfully convicted, the payment of damages may be to or for the benefit of the heirs of the deceased individual. Damages awarded shall be distributed according to a valid will or trust or, if no valid will or trust exists, to the heirs in the proportion the heirs would receive the personal estate of the decedent in the case of intestacy. Damages awarded may not be paid to creditors of the deceased individual under the laws of this Commonwealth.(4) The payment of damages may be in a lump sum or as an annuity as chosen by the petitioner.(5) Compensation awarded under this subchapter shall not be considered income for the purpose of computing the tax imposed under Article III of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(6) The petitioner may not receive compensation for any period during which the individual was also serving a sentence for another crime for which the individual was lawfully incarcerated.(c) Adjustment of statutory noneconomic damages.--Beginning 20250SB0054PN0452 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 January 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, the Court Administrator of Pennsylvania shall determine the percentage increase or decrease in the cost of living for the previous calendar year, based on changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. The increases or decreases shall be made in accordance with the following:(1) On or before July 1 of the year in which the Court Administrator of Pennsylvania makes the determination required under this subsection, the Court Administrator of Pennsylvania shall adjust the amounts prescribed under subsection (a)(1) and (2) for the following calendar year by multiplying the amounts applicable to the calendar year in which the adjustment is made by the percentage amount determined under this subsection.(2) The adjustment may not exceed 3% for any year.(3) The Court Administrator of Pennsylvania shall round the adjusted limitation amount to the nearest $100. The unrounded amount shall be used to calculate the adjustments to the amounts in subsequent calendar years.(4) The adjusted amounts shall become effective on July 1 of the year in which the adjustment is made and apply to claims filed under this section on or after July 1 of that year and before July 1 of the subsequent year.(5) The Court Administrator of Pennsylvania shall submit notice of the adjusted amounts to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.20250SB0054PN0452 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Civil offset and reimbursement.--If the petitioner receives a monetary award against the Commonwealth or a political subdivision of the Commonwealth in a civil action for wrongful conviction or imprisonment for the crimes at issue in the petition or has entered into a settlement agreement with the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth for wrongful conviction or imprisonment for the crimes at issue in the petition, the following shall apply:(1) The acceptance by the claimant of a judicial award, compromise or settlement, other than an award for wrongful conviction, must be in writing and shall, except if procured by fraud, be final and conclusive on the claimant and completely bar any further action by the claimant against the Commonwealth or political subdivision on the same subject matter.(2) The total award of statutory noneconomic damages under this subchapter shall be reduced by the sum of the monetary award received in the civil action or settlement agreement, less attorney fees, expenses and out-of-pocket costs paid by the petitioner in connection with obtaining the civil action award or settlement.(3) If the petitioner has already received compensation under this subchapter and subsequently receives a monetary award in a civil action or settlement, the petitioner shall reimburse the Commonwealth or political subdivision for the sum of the statutory noneconomic damages awarded under this section, less attorney fees, expenses and out-of-pocket costs paid by the petitioner in obtaining the civil action award or settlement, up to the full amount awarded under the petition.(4) Expenses incurred by the Commonwealth or any of its 20250SB0054PN0452 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agencies or political subdivisions, including expenses incurred to secure the individual's custody or involuntary treatment under section 6403 (relating to court-ordered involuntary treatment), or to feed, clothe or provide medical services for the individual while imprisoned and the value of any goods or services provided to the individual under 61 Pa.C.S. Ch. 11 Subch. E (relating to services after wrongful conviction) are not subject to reimbursement under this subsection.(e) Records.--(1) Immediately following the grant of a petition, the criminal history record information related to the crimes for which the petition was granted shall be unavailable consistent with the provisions related to limited access of criminal history record information under 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 9121 (relating to general regulations) and 9122.2 (relating to clean slate limited access) and shall have the same effect as provided for under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9122.5 (relating to effects of expunged records and records subject to limited access).(2) The court shall notify the petitioner of the right to expungment of the records and to request a copy of the complete record of conviction and an automatic expungement of the related criminal history record information.(3) The petitioner has two years from the date of the grant of the petition to request a copy of the conviction record and an automatic expungement. The petitioner may request a copy of the record in a manner determined by the court.§ 8585. Notice to Treasury.(a) Duty of court.--Following a ruling by Commonwealth Court 20250SB0054PN0452 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on a claim brought under this subchapter, the court shall provide a copy of the order to the State Treasurer with a statement of the total compensation due and owing to the petitioner and any other person.(b) Duty of Treasury Department.--Upon receipt of the notice, the Treasury Department shall contact the petitioner and counsel for the petitioner to make arrangements for payment.§ 8586. Statute of limitations.(a) Filing.--(1) Except as provided under subsection (b), an action brought under this subchapter to seek compensation for the wrongful conviction of an individual must be filed within six years of the date of release from incarceration or involuntary treatment or the reversal of the conviction, whichever is later.(2) Action by the Commonwealth challenging or appealing the grant of judicial relief shall toll the six-year period.(b) Commencement of action.--Notwithstanding subsection (a) or any other provision of law, an individual convicted, incarcerated and released from custody prior to the effective date of this section must commence an action under this subchapter no later than two years after the effective date of this section.Section 6. Chapter 11 of Title 61 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER ESERVICES AFTER WRONGFUL CONVICTIONSec.1181. Scope of subchapter.1182. Eligibility for services after wrongful conviction.20250SB0054PN0452 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1183. Services.1184. Regulations and rules.§ 1181. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to the provision of services to a wrongfully convicted individual after release.§ 1182. Eligibility for services after wrongful conviction.An individual released from incarceration in a State correctional institution or from court-ordered involuntary treatment who meets the eligibility criteria under 42 Pa.C.S. § 8582(a)(1) (relating to eligibility to seek compensation for wrongful conviction) shall be entitled to and the Commonwealth shall provide each service under section 1183 (relating to services).§ 1183. Services.The Commonwealth shall provide the following services to eligible individuals under section 1182 (relating to eligibility for services after wrongful conviction):(1) Services and programs at community corrections centers and group homes under 37 Pa. Code § 94.3 (relating to procedures for participation in prerelease programs).(2) General assistance under 55 Pa. Code § 141.61 (relating to policy).(3) Medical assistance for categorically needy, under the following:(i) 55 Pa. Code § 165.41 (relating to eligibility for special allowances for supportive services).(ii) 55 Pa. Code § 165.42 (relating to advance provision of special allowances for supportive services).(iii) 55 Pa. Code § 165.43 (relating to requests for special allowances for supportive services and time 20250SB0054PN0452 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 frames for eligibility determinations).(iv) 55 Pa. Code § 165.44 (relating to verification for special allowances for supportive services).(v) 55 Pa. Code § 165.45 (relating to time frames for authorization of special allowances for supportive services).(vi) 55 Pa. Code § 165.46 (relating to types of special allowances for supportive services).§ 1184. Regulations and rules.(a) Temporary regulations.--(1) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this subchapter:(i) The department, the Department of Human Services and the Board of Pardons may issue temporary regulations.(ii) The department shall issue the temporary regulations within six months of the effective date of this section. Regulations adopted after the six-month period shall be promulgated as provided by statute.(iii) Notice of the temporary regulations shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(iv) The department shall post the temporary regulations on its publicly accessible Internet website.(v) The temporary regulations shall expire no later than two years following publication of the temporary regulations in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) The temporary regulations under paragraph (1) shall be exempt from the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 20250SB0054PN0452 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Contents of regulations.--(1) Within 120 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall promulgate temporary regulations to ensure that the Department of Human Services receives identifying information for each individual who is eligible for services under section 1182 (relating to eligibility for services after wrongful conviction) and to ensure that each individual is provided with:(i) An application form for benefits under this section.(ii) An emergency stipend.(iii) Notice of the ability to seek compensation as provided under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 85 Subch. D (relating to claims for compensation for wrongful conviction).(2) Within 120 days of the effective date of this section, the Department of Human Services shall promulgate temporary regulations to implement the provision of benefits under this section. The regulations shall include:(i) Creation of an application for benefits.(ii) Designation of an individual to process 20250SB0054PN0452 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application forms for benefits that are received by the Department of Human Services, including ensuring that a determination of eligibility for benefits does not preclude the Commonwealth from opposing a determination of eligibility for compensation under 42 Pa.C.S. § 8583 (relating to petition for compensation).(iii) Drafting of procedures and guidelines for making determinations on applications.(iv) Requiring determinations to be made within 14 days of receipt of an application.(3) Within 120 days of the effective date of this section, the Board of Pardons shall promulgate temporary regulations to ensure that the Department of Human Services receives identifying information for each individual who, after having been released from incarceration or court-ordered involuntary treatment, is pardoned of the charges underlying the incarceration and to ensure that each individual is provided with:(i) An application form for benefits under this section.(ii) An emergency stipend.(iii) Notice of the ability to seek compensation as provided under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 85 Subch. D.(c) Permanent regulations.--Prior to the expiration of the temporary regulations, the department, the Department of Human Services and the Board of Pardons shall propose for approval permanent regulations as provided by statute. The proposed permanent regulations shall be consistent with subsection (b) and may be the same as the temporary regulations.(d) Rules of court administration.--Within 120 days of the 20250SB0054PN0452 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effective date of this section, the Court Administrator of Pennsylvania shall propose rules of judicial administration for adoption under the Pennsylvania Rules of Judicial Administration to ensure that the Department of Human Services receives identifying information for a wrongfully convicted individual as may be available in one of the unified judicial system case management systems.Section 7. Section 6171(a) of Title 61 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6171. Powers and duties of department.(a) Powers and duties.--The department shall have the following powers and duties:* * *(24) Assist the transition of an individual who has been exonerated and ensure access to the services and programs provided to individuals paroled under section 6132 (relating to specific powers of board involving offenders).* * *Section 8. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0054PN0452 - 19 - 12345678910111213141516171819